Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.017

Provisions applicable to health plans offered under this chapter. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5579-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1971-S.SL) ***

Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, and chapter 48.49 RCW.

[ 2024 c 242 s 10. Prior: 2022 c 236 s 3; 2022 c 228 s 2; 2022 c 10 s 2; 2021 c 280 s 2; 2019 c 427 s 21; 2016 c 139 s 4; 2008 c 304 s 2; 2007 c 502 s 2; 2000 c 5 s 20.]

NOTES:

Short title—2021 c 280: See note following RCW 49.60.178.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 427: See RCW 48.49.003 and 48.49.900.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—2007 c 502: See notes following RCW 48.43.083.

Intent—Purpose—2000 c 5: See RCW 48.43.500.

Application—Short title—Captions not law—Construction—Severability—Application to contracts—Effective dates—2000 c 5: See notes following RCW 48.43.500.

PDFRCW 41.05.017

Provisions applicable to health plans offered under this chapter. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5579-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1971-S.SL) ***

Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, and chapter 48.49 RCW.

[ 2024 c 251 s 5; 2024 c 242 s 10. Prior: 2022 c 236 s 3; 2022 c 228 s 2; 2022 c 10 s 2; 2021 c 280 s 2; 2019 c 427 s 21; 2016 c 139 s 4; 2008 c 304 s 2; 2007 c 502 s 2; 2000 c 5 s 20.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 242 s 10 and by 2024 c 251 s 5, without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2024 c 251: See note following RCW 70.41.495.

Short title—2021 c 280: See note following RCW 49.60.178.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 427: See RCW 48.49.003 and 48.49.900.

Savings—Severability—Effective date—2007 c 502: See notes following RCW 48.43.083.

Intent—Purpose—2000 c 5: See RCW 48.43.500.

Application—Short title—Captions not law—Construction—Severability—Application to contracts—Effective dates—2000 c 5: See notes following RCW 48.43.500.